Massachusetts, session 194th, S2213.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding sections 3 and 20 of chapter 6C of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts Department of Transportation may
release its interest in or grant an easement to a parcel of land in the city of Boston, currently
owned by the department and held by the city of Boston by an easement and license, to The 54th
Regiment Board, their heirs, successors and assigns for purposes of continuing to use the land
and improvements within the conveyed area.
(b) The parcel of department of transportation land #1809477000 at the Readville Station
which the release deed or easement shall apply is located 1717-1725 Hyde Park Avenue in Hyde
Park
of 2

(c) The parcel shall be conveyed by release deed or easement without warranties or
representations by the department upon such terms and conditions as the department deems
necessary or advisable. The grantee agrees to assume the cost of any appraisals, surveys and
other expenses deemed necessary by the department to execute the release or easement pursuant
to this act. As consideration for the release deed or easement authorized in this act, the grantees
shall pay to the commonwealth an amount equal to the fair market value of the department’s
interest in the parcel of land authorized to be released or granted under this act, as determined by
an independent appraisal prepared in accordance with the usual and customary professional
appraisal practices by a qualified appraiser commissioned by the department.
of 2